Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses ........... $111,679,551
(2) Marijuana regulation
- recreational ............................ $ 27,379,522
(3) Marijuana regulation
- medical ................................... $ 6,331,074
(4) Agents’ compensation
- all other .................................. $186,048,000
(5) Agents’ compensation
- distillery agents ...................... $ 12,512,000
(6) Capital improvements ............... $ 247,753
(7) Debt service .............................. $ 23,413,754
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by  the Oregon Liquor
and Cannabis Commission for liquor purchases are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5519 (SB 5519-A) Page 2